Utah statutes.
78B-13-205.   Notice -- Opportunity to be heard -- Joinder.

(1)  Before a child custody determination is made under this chapter, notice and an opportunity to be heard in accordance with the standards of Section 78B-13-108 shall be given to all persons entitled to notice under the law of this state as in child custody proceedings between residents of this state, any parent whose parental rights have not been previously terminated, and any person having physical custody of the child.

(2)  This chapter does not govern the enforceability of a child custody determination made without notice and an opportunity to be heard.

(3)  The obligation to join a party and the right to intervene as a party in a child custody proceeding under this chapter are governed by the law of this state as in child custody proceedings between residents of this state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

